apertium-sme-fin.fin.lexc
LEXICON kotus_11_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{aä}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
0:{aä}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveJEN	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:{oö}	NounStem/Plural	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{aä}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
0:{aä}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:{oö}	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_13_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_13_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:e	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_13_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{aä}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
0:{aä}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveJEN	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:{oö}	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_14_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{aä}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
0:{aä}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveJEN	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:{oö}	NounStem/Plural	;
0:{oö}{AV-}	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;

LEXICON kotus_15_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{aä}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
0:{aä}	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeISIIN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_16_NOUN/stemfiller
0:i	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
0:{aä}	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_17_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{aeiouyäö}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	NounAllomorph/IllativeSEEN	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeISIIN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{aeiouyäö}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	NounAllomorph/IllativeHVN	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_19uo_NOUN/stemfiller
0:uo	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:uo	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:uo	NounAllomorph/IllativeHVN	;
0:uo	NounStem/Singular	;
0:o	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
0:o	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
0:o	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
0:o	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:o	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_19yö_NOUN/stemfiller
0:yö	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:yö	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:yö	NounAllomorph/IllativeHVN	;
0:yö	NounStem/Singular	;
0:ö	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
0:ö	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
0:ö	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
0:ö	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:ö	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_19ie_NOUN/stemfiller
0:ie	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:ie	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:ie	NounAllomorph/IllativeHVN	;
0:ie	NounStem/Singular	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:e	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_20_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{aeiouyäö}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	NounAllomorph/IllativeHVN	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	NounAllomorph/IllativeSEEN	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeISIIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_21_NOUN/stemfiller
	NounStem/Nominative	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeHVN	;
	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_22_NOUN/stemfiller
	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:’	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:’	NounAllomorph/IllativeHVN	;
0:’	NounStem/Singular	;
0:’	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
0:’	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
0:’	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:’	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_23_NOUN/stemfiller
0:i	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:e	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_24_NOUN/stemfiller
0:i	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:e	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_25_NOUN/stemfiller
0:mi	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:me	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA+Vn	;
0:me	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:me	NounStem/Singular	;
0:n	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:n	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:m	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:m	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:m	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:m	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_26_NOUN/stemfiller
0:i	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:e	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_27_NOUN/stemfiller
0:si	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{t~~}e{F}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{t~~}e{F}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:t	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:t	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:s	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_28_NOUN/stemfiller
0:si	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{t~~}e{J}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{t~~}e{J}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:t	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:t	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:s	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_29_NOUN/stemfiller
0:psi	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:pse	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:pse	NounStem/Singular	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:ps	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:ps	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:ps	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:ps	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_30_NOUN/stemfiller
0:tsi	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:tse	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:tse	NounStem/Singular	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:ts	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:ts	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:ts	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:ts	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_31_NOUN/stemfiller
0:ksi	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:h{t~~}e{F}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:h{t~~}e{F}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:h	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:ks	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:ks	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:ks	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:ks	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_12_NOUN/stub
asia'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:asi{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
ateria'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:ateri{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
hartia'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:harti{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
ikkuna'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:ikkun{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
jyrinä'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:jyrin{^ä}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kapinoitsija'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:kapinoitsij{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kirjailija'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:kirjailij{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kynttilä'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:kynttil{^ä}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
latina'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:latin{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
lukija'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:lukij{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
matelija'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:matelij{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
nieriä'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:nieri{^ä}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
opiskelija'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:opiskelij{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
pappila'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:pappil{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
pesula'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:pesul{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
profetia'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:profeti{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
pääasia'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:pääasi{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
saatana'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:saatan{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
salama'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:salam{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
tarina'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:tarin{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
teknologia'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:teknologi{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
tulisija'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:tulisij{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
työntekijä'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:työntekij{^ä}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
vankila'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:vankil{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
vesiastia'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:vesiasti{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kauppatavara'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:kauppa{#}tavar{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
maksapasteija'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:maksa{#}pasteij{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
tulisija'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:tuli{#}sij{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
vesiastia'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:vesi{#}asti{^a}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
tavara'][POS=NOUN][KTN=12]:tavar{^a}{PLT?}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
LEXICON kotus_18_NOUN/stub
huhtikuu'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:huhtiku{^u}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
jää'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:jä{^ä}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kiirastorstai'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:kiirastorsta{^i}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
koi'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:ko{^i}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kuu'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:ku{^u}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
lauantai'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:lauanta{^i}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
maa'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:ma{^a}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
olkapää'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:olkapä{^ä}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
perjantai'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:perjanta{^i}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
sisämaa'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:sisäma{^a}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
sunnuntai'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:sunnunta{^i}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
syy'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:sy{^y}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
sää'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:sä{^ä}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
tee'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:te{^e}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
torstai'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:torsta{^i}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
ulkomaa'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:ulkoma{^a}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
voi'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:vo{^i}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
elokuu'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:elo{#}ku{^u}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
hedelmäpuu'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:hedelmä{#}pu{^u}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
helmikuu'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:helmi{#}ku{^u}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
jalkapuu'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:jalka{#}pu{^u}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kantapää'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:kanta{#}pä{^ä}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kylkiluu'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:kylki{#}lu{^u}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
marraskuu'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:marras{#}ku{^u}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
palmusunnuntai'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:palmu{#}sunnunta{^i}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
sukupuu'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:suku{#}pu{^u}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
toukokuu'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:touko{#}ku{^u}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
viikunapuu'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:viikuna{#}pu{^u}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
pitkäperjantai'][POS=NOUN][KTN=50]:pitkä{#}perjanta{^i}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
puu'][POS=NOUN][KTN=18]:pu{^u}{PLT?}	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
LEXICON Suffixes
virvilä'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=12]:virvil{^ä}	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
